Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Municipal Electric Plant Law of 1935

7-52-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Electric Plant Law of 1935.”

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1501.

Cross-References. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments for electrical service, §28-3-301.

Tax equivalent payments authorized, title 7, ch. 52, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 41.

Attorney General Opinions. Operation of telephone and cable television service by city, OAG 95-097, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110 (9/18/95).

Advertising and competitive bidding requirements for Lewisburg electrical system purchases, OAG 96-043, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (3/13/96).

Organization of the Clarksville electric power board. OAG 11-29, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/25/11).

“Growth and Development Fees” and “Impact Fees” levied by local utilities. OAG 12-11, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/3/12).

7-52-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acquire” means to purchase, lease, construct, reconstruct, replace, or acquire by gift;

“Dispose” means to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer any interest in property;

“Electric plant” means generating, transmission, or distribution systems, together with all other facilities, equipment and appurtenances necessary or appropriate to any such systems for the furnishing of electric power and energy for lighting, heating, power or any other purpose for which electric power and energy can be used;

“Electric service” means the furnishing of electric power and energy for lighting, heating, power or any other purpose for which electric power and energy can be used;

“Federal agency” includes the United States, the president of the United States, the department of housing and urban development, Tennessee Valley authority, or any other similar agency, instrumentality or corporation of the United States, that has heretofore been or may hereafter be created by or pursuant to any act or acts of the congress of the United States;

“Governing body” means the county legislative body, board, body or commission having general charge of the municipality;

“Improve” means to acquire any improvement;

“Improvement” means any improvement, extension, betterment, or addition to any electric plant;

“Law” means any act or statute, general, special or local, of the state of Tennessee, including, but not limited to, the charter of any municipality; and

“Municipality” means any county, metropolitan government, incorporated city or town in the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.2; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1502; Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 8.

7-52-103. Powers of municipalities.

Every municipality has the power and is authorized to:

Acquire, improve, operate and maintain within or without the corporate or county limits of such municipality, and within the corporate or county limits of any other municipality, with the consent of such other municipality, an electric plant and to provide electric service to any person, firm, public or private corporation, or to any other user or consumer of electric power and energy, and charge for the electric service;

Acquire, improve or use jointly with any other municipality a transmission line or lines together with all necessary and appropriate facilities, equipment and appurtenances for the purpose of transmitting power and energy or connecting their respective electric plants with a wholesale source of supply and, to this end, such municipality may provide by contract for the method of holding title, for the allocation of responsibility for operation and maintenance and for the allocation of expenses and revenues;

Accept grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal agency, for or in aid of the acquisition or improvement of any electric plant;

Contract debts for the acquisition or improvement of any electric plant, borrow money, and issue bonds and notes pursuant to the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, to finance such acquisition or improvements;

Assess, levy and collect unlimited ad valorem taxes on all property subject to taxation to pay such bonds, and the interest on the bonds;

Acquire, hold and, subject to the applicable provisions of any bonds or contracts, dispose of any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any right or interest in any such property in connection with any electric plant, and whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges or other encumbrances, but no municipality shall dispose of all or substantially all of its electric plant, except as provided in § 7-52-132;

Make contracts and execute instruments containing such covenants, terms and conditions as in the discretion of the municipality may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining loans from any source, or grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal agency; make all other contracts and execute all other instruments as in the discretion of the municipality may be necessary, proper or advisable in or for the furtherance of the acquisition, improvement, operation and maintenance of any electric plant and the furnishing of electric service; and carry out and perform the covenants and terms and conditions of all such contracts and instruments;

Enter on any lands, waters and premises for the purpose of making surveys, soundings and examinations in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of any electric plant and the furnishing of electric service; and

Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part.

In addition to the powers listed in subsection (a), each municipality has the power and is authorized to promote economic and industrial development through participation both as a borrower and a lender in the rural economic development loan and grant program established and administered by the rural development administration or its successor.

In addition to the authority granted under otherwise applicable law, each municipality operating an electric plant has the power and is authorized within its service area and on behalf of its municipality, acting through the authorization of the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric plant, to contract to establish a joint venture or other business relationship with one (1) or more third parties to provide the services authorized by § 7-52-601; provided, that, with respect to cable services, at least one (1) such third party shall be a current franchise holder that has been providing services in any state, either itself or its predecessor or predecessors, for not less than three (3) years at the time of the establishment of the joint venture or other business relationship. Any such joint venture or other business relationship shall be subject to §§ 7-52-602 — 7-52-609.

In addition to the authority granted under otherwise applicable law, each municipality operating an electric plant has the power and is authorized on behalf of its municipality, acting through the authorization of the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric plant, to establish a joint venture or any other business relationship with one (1) or more third parties to provide related services, subject to §§ 7-52-402 — 7-52-407. No contract or agreement between a municipal electric system and one (1) or more third parties for the provision of related services that provides for the joint ownership or joint control of assets, the sharing of profits and losses, or the sharing of gross revenues shall become effective or enforceable until the Tennessee public utility commission approves such contract or agreement on petition, and, after notice and opportunity to be heard, has been extended to interested parties. Notwithstanding § 65-4-101(6)(B) or any other provision of this code or of any private act, to the extent that any such joint venture or other business relationship provides related services, such joint venture or business relationship and every member of such joint venture or business relationship shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other certified providers of telecommunications services, including, but not limited to, rules or orders governing anti-competitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such regulation and only with respect to the provision of related services. This provision shall not apply to any related service or transaction that is not subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission.

In addition to the authority granted under otherwise applicable law, a municipality operating an electric plant may, acting through the authorization of the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric plant, accept and distribute excess receipts for bona fide economic development or community assistance purposes pursuant to programs approved by the board or supervisory body, which programs may include, but are not limited to, programs in which utility bills are rounded up to the next dollar when the amount of any excess receipt due to rounding is shown as a separate line on the utility bill.

Excess receipts accepted by a municipal electric plant pursuant to programs authorized by subdivision (e)(1) are not considered revenue to the municipal electric plant or the municipality's other utility systems, and the municipality may only use the excess receipts for economic development or community assistance purposes.

A municipality that establishes a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1) on or after January 1, 2021, shall not enroll any customer into the program without the express consent of the customer.

A customer who is enrolled in a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1) may opt out of the program by providing notice to the municipality of the customer's desire to cease participation in the program.

Upon receiving an opt-out notice from a customer, the municipality shall remove the customer from enrollment in the program no later than the first day of the customer's next regular billing cycle that begins no fewer than thirty (30) days after the date of the customer's opt-out notice.

Any municipality that on June 3, 2019, utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1) and operates the program on an opt-out basis shall send a written notice to each municipal electric plant customer no later than November 1, 2020, that contains, but is not limited to, the following information:

A statement that the municipality utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1), the program is operated on an opt-out basis, and a description of the program;

Notification that a customer whose bill is currently rounded up by the municipality has the right to opt out of participation in the program; and

Contact information for the municipality and instructions on how the customer may contact the municipality to opt out of participation in the program.

The written notice required by this subdivision (e)(4) may be provided to the customer by electronic means and may accompany a regular billing statement, at the discretion of the municipality.

A municipality that on June 3, 2019, utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1) and operates the program on an opt-out basis that fails to send the notice required by this subdivision (e)(4) shall, on and after January 1, 2021, cease operating the program on an opt-out basis and shall not operate a program unless operated in compliance with subdivision (e)(3).

For purposes of this subsection (e), “opt-out basis” means automatically enrolling customers in a program and requiring notice from the customer of a desire to be removed from the program in order to cease participation in the program.

Any municipality that utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1) and that maintains a website that is accessible by the general public shall publish in a conspicuous location on the website by November 1, 2020, and throughout the duration of the municipality's utilization of the program, the following information:

A statement that the municipal utility system utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (e)(1) and a description of the program;

Notification that a customer whose bill is currently rounded up by the utility has the right to opt out of participation in the program; and

Contact information for the utility and instructions on how the customer may contact the utility to opt into or out of participation in the program.

For purposes of this section, “related services” means those services authorized by § 7-52-401.

In addition to the authority granted under otherwise applicable law, each municipal electric system and each other governmental utility system established by private act that operates an electric plant have the power and are authorized, acting through the authorization of the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric system or governmental utility system, to enter into an employment contract for a term not to exceed five (5) years with the superintendent, general manager or chief executive officer of the electric plant. Any such contract must be terminable for cause, as more specifically defined in the contract, and the term of the contract may be renewed. If the board or supervisory body also has responsibility for other utility systems, and if the superintendent, general manager or chief executive officer is also the superintendent, general manager or chief executive officer for such other systems, then the contract may address all rights and responsibilities of such superintendent, general manager or chief executive officer. This subsection (g) shall only apply where, by private act or general law, the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric system or governmental utility system is directly responsible for making decisions regarding the employment of the superintendent, general manager or chief executive officer of the electric plant.

In addition to authority granted under otherwise applicable law, the utility of a municipality providing electric service operating pursuant to this part or other applicable law has the power to assist its utility customers in installing or maintaining fixtures, devices, appliances, apparatus, and equipment of all kinds and character and, in connection therewith, to purchase, acquire, lease, sell, distribute, incentivize, insure, make loans, provide service contracts, enter into agreements, contract with third parties, and repair such fixtures, devices, appliances, apparatus, and equipment and sell, assign, transfer, endorse, pledge, and otherwise dispose of notes or other evidences of indebtedness. Transactions with customers may provide for periodic payments to be added to customer monthly service billing statements. The utility may terminate utility service upon non-payment of these transactions in accordance with policies adopted by the utility's governing board.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1503; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 30; 1993, ch. 444, § 1; 1999, ch. 481, § 3; 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2012, ch. 748, § 1; 2013, ch. 2, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 13; 2019, ch. 228, § 2; 2019, ch. 508, § 3.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” throughout (d).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 228, added (h).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 508, rewrote (e), which read: “(1) In addition to the authority granted under otherwise applicable law, a municipality operating an electric plant has the power and is authorized, acting through the authorization of the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric plant, to accept and distribute voluntary contributions for bona fide economic development or community assistance purposes pursuant to programs approved by the board or supervisory body, which programs may include, but shall not be limited to, programs in which utility bills are rounded up to the next dollar when such contribution is shown as a separate line on the utility bill. (2) Contributions accepted by a municipal electric plant pursuant to programs authorized by subdivision (e)(1) shall not be considered revenue to the municipal electric plant or the municipality's other utility systems, and such contributions shall be used only for economic development or community assistance purposes.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 228, § 4. April 30, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 508, § 6. June 3, 2019.

Cross-References. Contracts with TVA or similar agency, powers, title 7, ch. 52, part 2.

Disposition of electric plant, §7-52-132.

Extension of service beyond city limits, §7-51-401.

General control of plant, supervisory body, superintendent, §7-52-114.

Tax equivalent payments authorized, title 7, ch. 52, part 3.

Tennessee regulatory authority, title 65, ch. 1.

7-52-104. Rights-of-way over public lands.

Any municipality may use any right-of-way, easement, or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of an electric plant, held by the state or any other municipality; provided, that such other municipality shall consent to such use.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1504.

7-52-105. Eminent domain.

Any municipality proceeding under this part is authorized and empowered to condemn any land, easement or rights-of-way, either on, under or above the ground, for any and all purposes necessary in connection with the construction, operation and maintenance of an electric plant or improvements to the electric plant. Title to property so condemned shall be taken in the name of the municipality. Such condemnation proceeding shall be pursuant to and in accordance with title 29, chapter 16; provided, that, where title to any property sought to be condemned is defective, it shall be passed by decree of court; provided, further, that, where condemnation proceedings become necessary, the court in which such proceedings are filed shall, upon application by the municipality and upon the posting of a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1505.

7-52-106. Preliminary expenses.

All expenses actually incurred by the governing body of any municipality in the making of surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, employment of engineers, attorneys or other employees, the giving of notices, taking of options, selling of bonds, and all other preliminary expenses of whatever nature, that such governing body deems necessary in connection with or precedent to the acquisition or improvement of any electric plant and that it deems necessary to be paid prior to the issuance and delivery of the bonds issued pursuant to this part, may be met and paid out of the general fund of the municipality not otherwise appropriated, or from any other available fund.

All such payments from the general or other funds shall be considered as temporary loans and shall be repaid immediately upon sale and delivery of the bonds, and claim for such repayment shall have priority over all other claims against the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1506.

7-52-107. Board of public utilities — Creation.

Any municipality, except those that employ a city-manager or that have a population of less than two thousand (2,000), issuing bonds under this part for the acquisition of an electric plant shall, and any municipality now or hereafter owning or operating an electric plant under this part or any other law may, appoint a board of public utilities, referred to as the “board” in this part.

The board shall be created in the following manner: at the time the governing body of a municipality issuing bonds under this part determines that a majority of the qualified voters voting on the election resolution have assented to the bond issue for the acquisition of an electric plant, the chief executive officer of the municipality shall, or if no such bonds are issued, or if the municipality employs a city-manager or has a population of less than two thousand (2,000), then at any time the chief executive officer may, with the consent of the governing body of the municipality, appoint two (2) or four (4) persons from among the property holders of such municipality who are residents of the municipality and have resided therein for not less than one (1) year next preceding the date of appointment to such board. The board of a municipal electric system may consist of two (2) or four (4) persons who have been for not less than one (1) year preceding the appointment both a customer of the municipal electric system and a resident of the county wherein such municipality is located. No regular compensated officer or employee of a municipality shall be eligible for such appointment until at least one (1) year after the expiration of the term of such person's public office.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1507; Acts 1990, ch. 664, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 664, § 2 provided that nothing in the amendment by that act shall be construed to abridge the term of any present member of a municipal electric board.

For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Residency requirement for membership on city's board of public utilities, OAG 98-0158, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (8/24/98).

In the context of this section, the term “chief executive officer” refers to the mayor of a city, not the city manager, OAG 03-119, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 137 (9/24/03).

Organization of the Clarksville electric power board. OAG 11-29, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/25/11).

7-52-108. Terms of board members — Official representative.

The original appointees, if two (2) are appointed, shall serve two (2) and four (4) years respectively, or if four (4) are appointed, shall serve for one (1), two (2), three (3) and four (4) years respectively, from July 1 next succeeding the date of appointment, as the chief executive officer shall designate.

Successors to retiring members so appointed shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years in the same manner, prior to the expiration of the term of office of the retiring member.

In addition to the members so appointed, such chief executive officer shall also, with the consent of the governing body of the municipality, designate a member of such governing body, or, in the chief executive officer's discretion, the city manager, to serve as a third or fifth member of the board, as the case may be. The term of such member shall be for such time as the appointing officer may fix, but in no event to extend beyond the member's term of office in such governing body or the member's employment as city manager, as the case may be. Appointments to complete unexpired terms of office shall be made in the same manner as original appointments.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1508.

Attorney General Opinions. In the context of this section, the term “chief executive officer” refers to the mayor of a city, not the city manager, OAG 03-119, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 137 (9/24/03).

Organization of the Clarksville electric power board. OAG 11-29, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/25/11).

7-52-109. Bond and oath of board members.

Each member shall give such bond, if any, as may be required by resolution of the governing body, and shall qualify by taking the same oath of office as required for members of such governing body.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1509.

7-52-110. Organization and meetings of board — Compensation of members and officers.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum and the board shall act by vote of majority present at any meeting attended by a quorum, and vacancies in the board shall not affect its power and authority so long as a quorum remains.

Within ten (10) days after appointment and qualification of members, the board shall hold a meeting to elect a chair. The board shall, at the same time, designate a secretary and treasurer, or secretary-treasurer, who need not be members of the board, and fix the amount of the surety bond that shall be required of such secretary and treasurer, or secretary-treasurer, and shall fix the compensation for such person or persons.

The board shall hold public meetings at least once per month, at such regular time and place as the board may determine. Changes in such time and place of meeting shall be made known to the public as far in advance as practicable.

The board shall establish its own rules of procedure, except as otherwise expressly provided.

All members of the board shall serve as such without compensation, but they shall be allowed necessary traveling and other expenses while engaged in the business of the board, including an allowance not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) per month for attendance at meetings. On or after July 1, 2011, the allowance may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) per month for attendance at meetings. Such expenses, as well as the salaries of the secretary and treasurer, or secretary-treasurer, shall constitute a cost of operation and maintenance of the electric plant.

All members of the board shall receive an additional allowance not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month for attendance at meetings for each additional utility system over which the board has jurisdiction as provided in §§ 7-52-111, 7-52-401 and 7-52-601 and the total allowances provided in this subsection (f) shall not exceed a maximum allowance of one hundred dollars ($100) per month. On or after July 1, 2011, the additional allowance may be increased to an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for each additional utility system and a maximum allowance not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month. Such additional allowances shall constitute a cost of operation and maintenance of the utility systems.

Additionally, the municipality may provide health insurance coverage for each member of the board and may pay the health insurance premiums for such coverage in the same manner as if the member were a municipal employee. Payment of such premiums on behalf of such members shall constitute a cost of operation and maintenance of the electric plant.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.13; Acts 1955, ch. 294, § 1; 1968, ch. 559, § 1; 1973, ch. 171, § 1; 1974, ch. 805, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1510; Acts 1994, ch. 781, § 1; 1999, ch. 246, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 163, §§ 1-3.

Attorney General Opinions. Payment of board members' health insurance premiums, OAG 94-005 , 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (1/13/94).

7-52-111. Jurisdiction of board over waterworks, sewerage works or gas system.

Municipalities now or hereafter owning or operating a waterworks, sewerage works, or gas system have the power and are hereby authorized to transfer to and confer upon the board the jurisdiction over such waterworks, sewerage works, or gas system now or hereafter vested in any other board, commission, or in the governing body of such municipalities.

If the board is given jurisdiction over such works, it shall keep separate accounts for the electric plant and each works, making due and proper allocation of all joint expenses, revenues and property valuations.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.13; Acts 1959, ch. 261, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1511.

7-52-112. Removal of board members.

Any member of the board may be removed from office for cause upon a vote of three fourths (¾) of the members of the governing body of the municipality, but only after preferment of formal charges by resolution of a majority of the members of such governing body at a public hearing before such governing body.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1512.

7-52-113. Records and reports of board.

The board shall keep a complete and accurate record of all meetings and actions taken, and of all receipts and disbursements, and shall make reports of the same to the governing body of the municipality at stated intervals, not to exceed one (1) year.

Such reports shall be in writing, shall be filed in open meeting of the governing body of the municipality, at stated intervals, not to exceed one (1) year, and a copy shall be filed with the municipal clerk or recorder.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1513.

7-52-114. General control of plant — Supervisory body — Superintendent.

The general supervision and control of the acquisition, improvement, operation and maintenance of the electric plant shall be in charge of the following agency, referred to as the “supervisory body” in this part:

The board; or if there be no board, then

The governing body of the municipality.

If the governing body of the municipality has charge of the supervision and control of the electric plant, such governing body may by resolution delegate all or any of its powers or duties as supervisory body to the city-manager, if any.

The supervisory body shall appoint an electric plant superintendent, referred to as “superintendent” in this part, who shall be qualified by training and experience for the general superintendence of the acquisition, improvement and operation of the electric plant. The superintendent need not be a resident of the state at the time of appointment. The superintendent's salary shall be fixed by the person or agency appointing such superintendent. The superintendent shall serve at the pleasure of the supervisory body and may be removed by such body at any time.

Subject only to an employment contract entered into pursuant to § 7-52-103(g), within the limits of the funds available, all powers to acquire, improve, operate and maintain, and to furnish electric service, and all powers necessary or convenient to furnishing electric service, conferred by this part shall be exercised on behalf of the municipality by the supervisory body and the superintendent, respectively.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1514; Acts 2012, ch. 748, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Hiring superintendent under T.C.A. §7-52-114(b). OAG 11-14, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/8/11).

7-52-115. Powers of supervisory body — Users of auxiliary energy sources.

Subject to applicable bonds or contracts, the supervisory body shall determine programs and make all plans for the acquisition of the electric plant, shall make all determinations as to improvements, rates and financial practices, may establish such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary or appropriate to govern the furnishing of electric service, and may disburse all moneys available in the electric plant fund established for the acquisition, improvement, operation and maintenance of the electric plant and the furnishing of electric service. A copy of the schedule of the current rates and charges in effect from time to time and a copy of all rules and regulations of the supervisory body relating to electric service shall be kept on public file at the main and all branch offices of the electric plant and also in the office of the municipal clerk or recorder.

When such municipal electric plant supplies its services to consumers who use solar or wind-powered equipment as a source of energy, such electric plant shall not discriminate against such consumers by its rates, fees or charges or by altering the availability or quality of energy.

Any consumer who uses solar, wind power, or other auxiliary source of energy shall install and operate the equipment, property, or appliance for such energy source in compliance with any state or local code or regulation applicable to the safe operation of such equipment, property, or appliance.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1515; Acts 1980, ch. 756, § 6.

Cross-References. Tax equivalent payments authorized, title 7, ch. 52, part 3.

7-52-116. Charges to municipality.

The supervisory body shall charge the municipality and all departments and works of the municipality for any electric service furnished to the municipality, at the rates applicable to other customers taking service under similar conditions. Revenues derived from such service shall be treated as all other revenues.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1516.

7-52-117. Powers of superintendent.

The superintendent shall have charge of all actual construction, the immediate management and operation of the electric plant and the enforcement and execution of all rules, regulations, programs, plans and decisions made or adopted by the supervisory body.

The superintendent shall appoint all employees and fix their duties and compensation, excepting that the appointment of all technical consultants and advisers and legal assistants shall be subject to the approval of the supervisory body.

Subject to § 7-52-132, the superintendent, with the approval of the supervisory body, may acquire and dispose of all property, real and personal, necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part. The title of such property shall be taken in the name of the municipality.

The superintendent shall let all contracts, subject to the approval of the supervisory body, but may, without such approval, obligate the electric plant on purchase orders up to an amount to be fixed by the supervisory body, but not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Any work or construction exceeding in cost the amount specified in this subsection (d) shall, before any contract is let or work done, be advertised by the superintendent for bids, but the supervisory body shall have power to reject any and all bids.

The superintendent shall make and keep full and proper books and records, subject to the supervision and direction of the supervisory body.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 4708.14; Acts 1969, ch. 179, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1517; Acts 1989, ch. 286, § 1; 1997, ch. 531, § 7.

Cross-References. Disposition of plant by governing body, §7-52-132.

7-52-118. Additional board members for certain municipal utilities providing electric service in multiple counties.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, when a municipal utility provides electric service in multiple counties and one (1) of the counties outside of the county in which the principal office of the utility is located has in excess of sixty percent (60%) of the customers residing in it, then such municipal utility shall create and install two (2) additional board members from the county that has in excess of sixty percent (60%) of the utility customers. The county mayor of the county that has in excess of sixty percent (60%) of the customers shall recommend persons to fill the new board member positions. The city council or chief legislative body of the city that owns the municipal utility shall accept or reject the recommendation or recommendations at a public meeting by a simple majority vote. If the recommended person or persons are not accepted or rejected within thirty (30) days following the date of the recommendation, the person or persons shall be deemed accepted. If rejected, the county mayor shall recommend another person or persons until the city council or chief legislative body of the city accepts the recommendation or recommendations. Such board members shall not be considered city council persons or employees of the municipality, nor shall they receive any insurance benefits. The terms of such board members shall be four (4) years and each shall serve until their successor is selected and assumes office. In the event a vacancy occurs, the county mayor shall initiate the procedure described in this section to appoint a successor to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

For implementation purposes, one (1) board member shall assume office on July 1, 2005, and the other shall assume office on July 1, 2006.

Such appointees shall be customers of the municipal utility for not less than one (1) year and shall not be an employee or board member of any other utility.

This section shall in no way affect or change the in lieu of tax payment procedure or recipient in effect prior to May 17, 2005, and further ratifies such procedure.

This section shall only apply to municipal utilities that are wholly located within the state and otherwise subject to this section.

Acts 2005, ch. 178, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§7-52-118 —7-52-131 (Acts 1935, ch. 32, §§ 4-11,15-17; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 3708.4-3708.11, 3708.15-3708.17; Acts 1969, ch. 284, § 4; 1972, ch. 740, §§ 4(16)-4(18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-1518 — 6-1531), concerning bond issues, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 31.

Acts 2005, ch. 178, § 2, provides that if any provision of that act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then all provisions and applications of that act are declared to be invalid and void.

7-52-119 — 7-52-131. [Reserved.]

The governing body of the municipality may dispose of all or substantially all of the electric plant acquired by means of bonds issued under this part, but only with the approval of the supervisory body and a majority of those voting in an election held as follows:

The governing body of the municipality shall adopt a resolution, which shall state in substance:

That the supervisory body has approved the proposed disposition;

A full description of the property to be disposed of;

The purchaser or purchasers of the property;

The purchase price;

The terms or conditions of sale if such disposition is not for cash, payable in full at the time of such disposition;

The date on which such election will be held;

The place or places where votes may be cast; and

The hours between which such voting places may be open; and

At such election the ballot shall contain the words “For the disposition of the electric plant” and “Against the disposition of the electric plant.”

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1532.

Cross-References. Power of superintendent to dispose of property, §7-52-117.

7-52-133. Supplemental nature of law.

The powers conferred by this part shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law. Bonds may be issued under this part for the acquisition or improvement of an electric plant, notwithstanding that any other law may provide for the issuance of bonds for like purposes and without regard to the requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any other law.

Acts 1935, ch. 32, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.23; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1533.